Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2412
Person, defined.

Person shall mean a natural person, public authority, private corporation, association, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or business trust of any nature whatsoever organized and existing under the laws of this state or of the United States or any other state thereof.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 144.